Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [462.3655] MINIMUM PARKING MANDATES PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, home rule charter, or ordinance to the contrary, a political subdivision shall not impose minimum parking mandates for residential, commercial, or industrial properties within its jurisdiction. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, "minimum parking mandate" means a law, rule, or ordinance that specifies a minimum number of off-street motor vehicle parking spaces, including within a garage or other enclosed area, except that additional disability parking spaces may be required to meet the requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act. new text end new text begin (c) This section does not prohibit a political subdivision from passing an ordinance under section 169.346, subdivision 4, related to disability parking spaces. new text end new text begin (d) This section does not prohibit a political subdivision from offering a nonbinding recommendation for a property within its jurisdiction to provide a specified number of parking spaces. new text end